src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
Ojibwe verb stems                           

The verbs are analysed as follows:
* We split the Verb lexicon in 4 groups according to transitivity class
* For each group, we add the prefixes, and mark them with *flag diacritics* (the @ symbols)
* Then come the stems themselves
* Finally, come the suffixes, including flag diacritics
to ensure that the correct prefixes and suffixes are matched together

Prefixes and suffixes are in affixes/verbs.lexc, whereas
the stems are in stems/verbs.lexc

The Ojibwe verbs are divided in four groups:

1. IA: Intransitive animate
1. II: Intransitive inanimate
1. TA: Transitive animate
1. TI: Transitive inanimate

The stems

LEXICON IASTEM    

-mo 

-de

-aa / go/be ?

VAI2 extracted from pdfs in Gikendandaa Ojibwemowin.
All of these are -am stems. What is (CH)?

VAI3 extracted from pdfs in Gikendandaa Ojibwemowin
All of these are -shin stems. What is (CH)?

dw- ?

LEXICON IISTEM    

TODO: these need morphology

LEXICON TASTEM_am    

LEXICON TASTEM_aw    

-zo passives

TODO: morphology for the -zo passives

LEXICON ZO    

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-ciw/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
